Missouri, session 2026, HB1961.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto sixteen new sections,
to be known as sections 324.214, 324.218, 324.1800, 324.1805, 324.1810, 324.1815,
324.1820, 324.1825, 324.1830, 324.1835, 324.1840, 324.1845, 324.1850, 324.1855,
324.1860, and 324.1865, to read as follows:
324.214. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "License", a license, certificate, registration, permit, accreditation, or
military occupational specialty that enables a person to legally practice an occupation or
profession in a particular jurisdiction;
(2) "Military", the Armed Forces of the United States, including the Air Force,
Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, National Guard, and any other
military branch that is designated by Congress as part of the Armed Forces of the
United States, and all reserve components and auxiliaries. The term "military" also
includes the military reserves and militia of any United States territory or state;
(3) "Nonresident military spouse", a nonresident spouse of an active-duty
member of the Armed Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is
scheduled to be transferred to the state of Missouri, or who has been transferred or is
scheduled to be transferred to an adjacent state and is or will be domiciled in the state of
Missouri, or has moved to the state of Missouri on a permanent change-of-station basis;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1961 2
(4) "Oversight body", any board, department, agency, or office of a jurisdiction
that issues licenses;
(5) "Resident military spouse", a spouse of an active-duty member of the Armed
Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to
the state of Missouri or an adjacent state and who is a permanent resident of the state of
Missouri, who is domiciled in the state of Missouri, or who has Missouri as his or her
home of record.
2. Any person who holds a valid current dietitian license issued by another state,
a branch or unit of the military, a territory of the United States, or the District of
Columbia, and who has been licensed for at least one year in such other jurisdiction,
may submit to the committee an application for a dietitian license in Missouri along with
proof of current licensure and proof of licensure for at least one year in the other
jurisdiction.
3. The committee shall:
(1) Within six months of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of
this section, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for
licensure in this state for the applicant if it determines that there were minimum
education requirements and, if applicable, work experience and clinical supervision
requirements in effect and the other jurisdiction verifies that the person met those
requirements in order to be licensed or certified in that jurisdiction. The committee
may require an applicant to take and pass an examination specific to the laws of this
state; or
(2) Within thirty days of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of
this section from a nonresident military spouse or a resident military spouse, waive any
examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in this state for the
applicant and issue such applicant a license under this section if such applicant
otherwise meets the requirements of this section.
4. (1) The committee shall not waive any examination, educational, or
experience requirements for any applicant who has had his or her license revoked by an
oversight body outside the state; who is currently under investigation, who has a
complaint pending, or who is currently under disciplinary action, except as provided in
subdivision (2) of this subsection, with an oversight body outside the state; who does not
hold a license in good standing with an oversight body outside the state; who has a
criminal record that would disqualify him or her for licensure in Missouri; or who does
not hold a valid current license in the other jurisdiction on the date the committee
receives his or her application under this section.

HB 1961 3
(2) If another jurisdiction has taken disciplinary action against an applicant, the
committee shall determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter
resolved. If the matter has not been resolved by that jurisdiction, the committee may
deny a license until the matter is resolved.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the committee from denying a license to
an applicant under this section for any reason described in section 324.217.
6. Any person who is licensed under the provisions of this section shall be subject
to the committee's jurisdiction and all rules and regulations pertaining to the practice as
a dietitian in this state.
7. This section shall not be construed to waive any requirement for an applicant
to pay any fees.
324.218. 1. An applicant who has not previously taken or passed an examination
recognized by the committee and who meets the qualifications of subsection 2 of section
324.210 may obtain without examination a nonrenewable temporary license by paying a
temporary-license fee and submitting to the committee an agreement-to-supervise form
that is signed by a licensed dietitian who has agreed to supervise the applicant. Such
temporary licensee may practice dietetics, but any such practice shall be under the
supervision of a dietitian licensed in this state.
2. (1) Any dietitian who has agreed to supervise a temporary licensee shall hold
an unencumbered license to practice dietetics in this state and shall provide the
committee proof of active dietetics practice in this state for a minimum of one year
before supervising the temporary licensee.
(2) The supervising dietitian shall not be an immediate family member of the
temporary licensee. The committee shall define the term "immediate family member"
for purposes of this subdivision and the scope of such supervision by rule.
3. (1) The dietitian who has agreed to supervise the applicant for a temporary
license shall submit to the committee a signed and notarized form prescribed by the
committee attesting that the applicant for a temporary license shall begin employment
at a location in this state within seven days of issuance of the temporary license.
(2) If the temporary licensee's employment described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection ceases, the supervising dietitian shall notify the committee within three days
of such cessation.
4. A licensed dietitian shall not supervise more than one temporary licensee at a
time.
5. The temporary license obtained by an applicant under this section shall expire
the date the committee is notified by the supervising dietitian that the temporary

HB 1961 4
licensee's employment has ceased or within one hundred eighty days of its issuance,
whichever occurs first.
324.1800. 1. Sections 324.1800 to 324.1865 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Dietitian Licensure Compact".
2. The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate Practice of Dietetics
with the goal of improving public access to dietetics services. This Compact preserves
the regulatory authority of States to protect public health and safety through the
current system of State licensure, while also providing for licensure portability through
a Compact Privilege granted to qualifying professionals.
3. This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
(1) Increase public access to dietetics services;
(2) Provide opportunities for interstate practice by Licensed Dietitians who meet
uniform requirements;
(3) Eliminate the necessity for Licenses in multiple States;
(4) Reduce administrative burden on Member States and Licensees;
(5) Enhance the States' ability to protect the public's health and safety;
(6) Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating multistate
practice of Licensed Dietitians;
(7) Support relocating Active Military Members and their spouses;
(8) Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary
information among Member States; and
(9) Vest all Member States with the authority to hold a Licensed Dietitian
accountable for meeting all State practice laws in the State in which the patient is
located at the time care is rendered.
324.1805. As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) "ACEND" means the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and
Dietetics or its successor organization.
(2) "Active Military Member" means any individual with full-time duty status in
the active armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard
and Reserve.
(3) "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal
action permitted by a State's laws which is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other
authority against a Licensee, including actions against an individual's License or
Compact Privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
Licensee, limitation on the Licensee's practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure

HB 1961 5
affecting a Licensee's authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist
action.
(4) "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice
remediation process approved by a Licensing Authority.
(5) "Charter Member State" means any Member State which enacted this
Compact by law before the Effective Date specified in section 324.1855.
(6) "Continuing Education" means a requirement, as a condition of License
renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of, educational and
professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
(7) "CDR" means the Commission on Dietetic Registration or its successor
organization.
(8) "Compact Commission" means the government agency whose membership
consists of all States that have enacted this Compact, which is known as the Dietitian
Licensure Compact Commission, as described in section 324.1835, and which shall
operate as an instrumentality of the Member States.
(9) "Compact Privilege" means a legal authorization, which is equivalent to a
License, permitting the Practice of Dietetics in a Remote State.
(10) "Current Significant Investigative Information" means:
(a) Investigative Information that a Licensing Authority, after a preliminary
inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the subject Licensee to
respond, if required by State law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved
true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or
(b) Investigative Information that indicates that the subject Licensee represents
an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the subject
Licensee has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
(11) "Data System" means a repository of information about Licensees,
including, but not limited to, Continuing Education, examination, licensure,
investigative, Compact Privilege and Adverse Action information.
(12) "Encumbered License" means a License in which an Adverse Action
restricts a Licensee's ability to practice dietetics.
(13) "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on a
Licensee's full and unrestricted Practice of Dietetics by a Licensing Authority.
(14) "Executive Committee" means a group of delegates elected or appointed to
act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, this Compact, and the
Compact Commission.
(15) "Home State" means the Member State that is the Licensee's primary State
of residence or that has been designated pursuant to section 324.1825.

HB 1961 6
(16) "Investigative Information" means information, records, and documents
received or generated by a Licensing Authority pursuant to an investigation.
(17) "Jurisprudence Requirement" means an assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the State laws and regulations governing the Practice of Dietetics in such
State.
(18) "License" means an authorization from a Member State to either:
(a) Engage in the Practice of Dietetics (including medical nutrition therapy); or
(b) Use the title "dietitian," "licensed dietitian," "licensed dietitian nutritionist,"
"certified dietitian," or other title describing a substantially similar practitioner as the
Compact Commission may further define by Rule.
(19) "Licensee" or "Licensed Dietitian" means an individual who currently
holds a License and who meets all of the requirements outlined in section 324.1815.
(20) "Licensing Authority" means the board or agency of a State, or equivalent,
that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of the Practice of Dietetics.
(21) "Member State" means a State that has enacted the Compact.
(22) "Practice of Dietetics" means the synthesis and application of dietetics as
defined by state law and regulations, primarily for the provision of nutrition care
services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person or via telehealth, to prevent,
manage, or treat diseases or medical conditions and promote wellness.
(23) "Registered Dietitian" means a person who:
(a) Has completed applicable education, experience, examination, and
recertification requirements approved by CDR;
(b) Is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a registered dietitian
nutritionist; and
(c) Is legally authorized to use the title registered dietitian or registered dietitian
nutritionist and the corresponding abbreviations "RD" or "RDN."
(24) "Remote State" means a Member State other than the Home State, where a
Licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise a Compact Privilege.
(25) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the Compact Commission that
has the force of law.
(26) "Single State License" means a License issued by a Member State within
the issuing State and does not include a Compact Privilege in any other Member State.
(27) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
States of America.
(28) "Unencumbered License" means a License that authorizes a Licensee to
engage in the full and unrestricted Practice of Dietetics.
324.1810. 1. To participate in the Compact, a State must currently:

HB 1961 7
(1) License and regulate the Practice of Dietetics; and
(2) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about
Licensees.
2. A Member State shall:
(1) Participate fully in the Compact Commission's Data System, including using
the unique identifier as defined in Rules;
(2) Notify the Compact Commission, in compliance with the terms of the
Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of Current Significant
Investigative Information regarding a Licensee;
(3) Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history record
information of applicants for an initial Compact Privilege. These procedures shall
include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by
applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record
information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for
retaining that State's criminal records;
(a) A Member State must fully implement a criminal history record information
requirement, within a time frame established by Rule, which includes receiving the
results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search and shall use those results
in determining Compact Privilege eligibility.
(b) Communication between a Member State and the Compact Commission or
among Member States regarding the verification of eligibility for a Compact Privilege
shall not include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
relating to a federal criminal history record information check performed by a Member
State;
(4) Comply with and enforce the Rules of the Compact Commission;
(5) Require an applicant for a Compact Privilege to obtain or retain a License in
the Licensee's Home State and meet the Home State's qualifications for licensure or
renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable State laws; and
(6) Recognize a Compact Privilege granted to a Licensee who meets all of the
requirements outlined in section 324.1815 in accordance with the terms of the Compact
and Rules.
3. Member States may set and collect a fee for granting a Compact Privilege.
4. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue to be able to apply
for a Member State's Single State License as provided under the laws of each Member
State. However, the Single State License granted to these individuals shall not be
recognized as granting a Compact Privilege to engage in the Practice of Dietetics in any
other Member State.

HB 1961 8
5. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.
6. At no point shall the Compact Commission have the power to define the
requirements for the issuance of a Single State License to practice dietetics. The
Member States shall retain sole jurisdiction over the provision of these requirements.
324.1815. 1. To exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and provisions
of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
(1) Satisfy one of the following:
(a) Hold a valid current registration that gives the applicant the right to use the
term Registered Dietitian; or
(b) Complete all of the following:
a. An education program which is either:
(i) A master's degree or doctoral degree that is programmatically accredited by:
i. ACEND; or
ii. A dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education, which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine, and from a college
or university accredited at the time of graduation by the appropriate regional
accrediting agency recognized by the Council on Higher Education Accreditation and
the United States Department of Education.
(ii) An academic degree from a college or university in a foreign country
equivalent to the degree described in item (i) that is programmatically accredited by:
i. ACEND; or
ii. A dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education, which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine.
b. A planned, documented, supervised practice experience in dietetics that is
programmatically accredited by:
(i) ACEND; or
(ii) A dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine and which involves
at least 1000 hours of practice experience under the supervision of a Registered Dietitian
or a Licensed Dietitian.
c. Successful completion of either:
(i) The Registration Examination for Dietitians administered by CDR; or
(ii) A national credentialing examination for dietitians approved by the Compact
Commission by Rule; such completion being no more than five years prior to the date of
the Licensee's application for initial licensure and accompanied by a period of

HB 1961 9
continuous licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed by the Rules of the
Compact Commission;
(2) Hold an Unencumbered License in the Home State;
(3) Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is seeking a Compact
Privilege within a Remote State or States;
(4) Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the Compact Privilege;
(5) Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the Remote State or
States in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege; and
(6) Report to the Compact Commission any Adverse Action, Encumbrance, or
restriction on a License taken by any non-Member State within 30 days from the date
the action is taken.
2. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date of the Home State
License. To maintain a Compact Privilege, renewal of the Compact Privilege shall be
congruent with the renewal of the Home State License as the Compact Commission may
define by Rule. The Licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection 1 of this
section to maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote State or States.
3. A Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege shall adhere to the laws and
regulations of the Remote State. Licensees shall be responsible for educating themselves
on, and complying with, any and all State laws relating to the Practice of Dietetics in
such Remote State.
4. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this Compact or State
law, a Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege shall not be required to complete
Continuing Education Requirements required by a Remote State. A Licensee exercising
a Compact Privilege is only required to meet any Continuing Education Requirements
as required by the Home State.
324.1820. 1. A Licensee may hold a Home State License, which allows for a
Compact Privilege in other Member States, in only one Member State at a time.
2. If a Licensee changes Home State by moving between two Member States:
(1) The Licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new Home State License
based on a Compact Privilege, pay all applicable fees, and notify the current and new
Home State in accordance with the Rules of the Compact Commission.
(2) Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new Home State License by
virtue of a Compact Privilege, the new Home State shall verify that the Licensee meets
the criteria in section 324.1815 via the Data System, and require that the Licensee
complete the following:
(a) Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based criminal history record
information check;

HB 1961 10
(b) Any other criminal history record information required by the new Home
State; and
(c) Any Jurisprudence Requirements of the new Home State.
(3) The former Home State shall convert the former Home State License into a
Compact Privilege once the new Home State has activated the new Home State License
in accordance with applicable Rules adopted by the Compact Commission.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if the Licensee cannot
meet the criteria in section 324.1815, the new Home State may apply its requirements
for issuing a new Single State License.
(5) The Licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new Home State in order to
be issued a new Home State License.
3. If a Licensee changes their State of residence by moving from a Member State
to a non-Member State, or from a non-Member State to a Member State, the State
criteria shall apply for issuance of a Single State License in the new State.
4. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee's ability to hold a
Single State License in multiple States; however, for the purposes of this Compact, a
Licensee shall have only one Home State License.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.
324.1825. An Active Military Member, or their spouse, shall designate a Home
State where the individual has a current License in good standing. The individual may
retain the Home State designation during the period the service member is on active
duty.
324.1830. 1. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a Remote
State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing State due process law, to:
(1) Take Adverse Action against a Licensee's Compact Privilege within that
Member State; and
(2) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas
issued by a Licensing Authority in a Member State for the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of evidence from another Member State shall be enforced in
the latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and
procedure applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before that court. The
issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees
required by the service statutes of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are
located.

HB 1961 11
2. Only the Home State shall have the power to take Adverse Action against a
Licensee's Home State License.
3. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State shall give the same
priority and effect to reported conduct received from a Member State as it would if the
conduct had occurred within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State shall apply
its own State laws to determine appropriate action.
4. The Home State shall complete any pending investigations of a Licensee who
changes Home States during the course of the investigations. The Home State shall also
have authority to take appropriate action or actions and shall promptly report the
conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of the Data System. The
administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify the new Home State of any
Adverse Actions.
5. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover from the
affected Licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any
Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
6. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the factual findings of
another Remote State, provided that the Member State follows its own procedures for
taking the Adverse Action.
7. (1) In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its respective
State law, any Member State may participate with other Member States in joint
investigations of Licensees.
(2) Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint investigation initiated under the Compact.
8. If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against a Licensee's Home State
License resulting in an Encumbrance on the Home State License, the Licensee's
Compact Privilege or Privileges in all other Member States shall be revoked until all
Encumbrances have been removed from the Home State License. All Home State
disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action against a Licensee shall include a
statement that the Licensee's Compact Privileges are revoked in all Member States
during the pendency of the order.
9. Once an Encumbered License in the Home State is restored to an
Unencumbered License (as certified by the Home State's Licensing Authority), the
Licensee must meet the requirements of subsection 1 of section 324.1815 and follow the
administrative requirements to reapply to obtain a Compact Privilege in any Remote
State.

HB 1961 12
10. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly notify the
administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the Data System shall promptly
notify the other Member States of any Adverse Actions.
11. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's decision that
participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action.
324.1835. 1. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that have enacted
the Compact known as the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission. The Compact
Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one State. The Compact Commission shall come into existence
on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in section 324.1855.
2. (1) Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected
by that Member State's Licensing Authority.
(2) The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the Licensing Authority
or their designee.
(3) The Compact Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office
for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Compact Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
(5) A Member State's Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate
occurring on the Compact Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
(6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the Compact
Commission requiring a vote by the delegates.
(7) Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in the bylaws. The
bylaws may provide for delegates to meet and vote in-person or by telecommunication,
video conference, or other means of communication.
(8) The Compact Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Compact Commission
may meet in person or by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of
communication.
3. The Compact Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the Compact Commission;
(2) Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) Establish and amend Rules and bylaws;
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact, the Compact Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;

HB 1961 13
(6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Compact Commission, provided that the standing of any Licensing Authority to sue or
be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member State as
the authenticated business records of the Compact Commission, and designate an agent
to do so on the Compact Commission's behalf;
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a Member State;
(10) Conduct an annual financial review;
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact,
and establish the Compact Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(12) Assess and collect fees;
(13) Accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money, other sources of
revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, services, and gifts, and receive, utilize, and
dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Compact Commission shall avoid any
actual or appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
(14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(17) Borrow money;
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this
Compact or the bylaws;
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
(20) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a vice
chair;
(21) Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially different from
the model compact language such that the State would not qualify for participation in
the Compact; and

HB 1961 14
(22) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact.
4. (1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Compact Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
(a) Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its Rules and
bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
(b) Recommend to the Compact Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws,
changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member States, fees
charged to Licensees, and other fees;
(c) Ensure Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract;
(d) Prepare and recommend the budget;
(e) Maintain financial records on behalf of the Compact Commission;
(f) Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and provide compliance
reports to the Compact Commission;
(g) Establish additional committees as necessary;
(h) Exercise the powers and duties of the Compact Commission during the
interim between Compact Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties
expressly reserved to the Compact Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
(i) Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Compact Commission.
(2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine members:
(a) The chair and vice chair of the Compact Commission shall be voting
members of the Executive Committee;
(b) Five voting members from the current membership of the Compact
Commission, elected by the Compact Commission;
(c) One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized professional association
representing dietitians; and
(d) One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national credentialing
100 organization for dietitians.
101 (3) The Compact Commission may remove any member of the Executive
102 Committee as provided in the Compact Commission's bylaws.
103 (4) (a) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.

HB 1961 15
104 (b) Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
105 Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in
106 subdivision (2) of subsection 6 of this section.
107 (c) The Executive Committee shall give 30 days' notice of its meetings, posted on
108 the website of the Compact Commission and as determined to provide notice to persons
109 with an interest in the business of the Compact Commission.
110 (d) The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with
111 paragraph (c) of subdivision (1) of subsection 6 of this section.
112 5. The Compact Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an
113 annual report.
114 6. (1) (a) All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Compact
115 Commission may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subdivision (2) of
116 this subsection.
117 (b) Public notice for all meetings of the full Compact Commission shall be given
118 in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in section 324.1845,
119 except that the Compact Commission may hold a special meeting as provided in
120 paragraph (c) of this subdivision.
121 (c) The Compact Commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to
122 conduct emergency business by giving 24 hours' notice to all Member States, on the
123 Compact Commission's website, and other means as provided in the Compact
124 Commission's Rules. The Compact Commission's legal counsel shall certify that the
125 Compact Commission's need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
126 (2) The Compact Commission or the Executive Committee or other committees
127 of the Compact Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the
128 Compact Commission or Executive Committee or other committees of the Compact
129 Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
130 (a) Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the Compact;
131 (b) The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters, practices, or
132 procedures related to specific employees;
133 (c) Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the Compact Commission
134 or by a Member State's Licensing Authority;
135 (d) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
136 (e) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
137 real estate;
138 (f) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
139 (g) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
140 confidential;

HB 1961 16
141 (h) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
142 unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
143 (i) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
144 (j) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of
145 or for use of the Compact Commission or other committee charged with responsibility
146 of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
147 (k) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or Member State
148 law; or
149 (l) Other matters as specified in the Rules of the Compact Commission.
150 (3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state
151 that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and
152 such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
153 (4) The Compact Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
154 all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of
155 actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed.
156 All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such
157 minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal,
158 subject to release only by a majority vote of the Compact Commission or order of a
159 court of competent jurisdiction.
160 7. (1) The Compact Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
161 reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
162 (2) The Compact Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
163 sources as provided in subdivision (13) of subsection 3 of this section.
164 (3) The Compact Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
165 from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom it
166 grants a Compact Privilege to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
167 Compact Commission and its staff, which must, in a total amount, be sufficient to cover
168 its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other
169 sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Member States shall be allocated
170 based upon a formula that the Compact Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
171 (4) The Compact Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
172 securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Compact Commission
173 pledge the credit of any of the Member States, except by and with the authority of the
174 Member State.
175 (5) The Compact Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
176 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Compact Commission shall be
177 subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.

HB 1961 17
178 However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Compact Commission
179 shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public
180 accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and become part
181 of the annual report of the Compact Commission.
182 8. (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives
183 of the Compact Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally
184 and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal
185 injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
186 or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
187 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
188 employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subdivision shall
189 be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,
190 injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
191 person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the Compact Commission shall
192 not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
193 (2) The Compact Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
194 director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission in any civil action
195 seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
196 occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or
197 responsibilities, or as determined by the Compact Commission that the person
198 against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
199 scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that
200 nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
201 counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error,
202 or omission did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton
203 misconduct.
204 (3) The Compact Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
205 officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission for
206 the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of
207 any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Compact
208 Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a
209 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
210 employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or
211 omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
212 person.

HB 1961 18
213 (4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
214 Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by
215 any other applicable State laws.
216 (5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
217 a Member State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect
218 to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal
219 antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
220 (6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
221 immunity by the Member States or by the Compact Commission.
324.1840. 1. The Compact Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated Data System.
2. The Compact Commission shall assign each applicant for a Compact Privilege
a unique identifier, as determined by the Rules.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a Member
State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all individuals to whom this
Compact is applicable as required by the Rules of the Compact Commission, including:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Adverse Actions against a License or Compact Privilege and information
related thereto;
(4) Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to
such participation not made confidential under Member State law;
(5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such
denial;
(6) The presence of Current Significant Investigative Information; and
(7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Compact Commission.
4. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to this
Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Compact Commission or an
agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the Compact
Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant
judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a Member State.
5. Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any
Member State will only be available to other Member States.
6. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any Adverse Action
against a Licensee and to monitor the Data System to determine whether any Adverse

HB 1961 19
Action has been taken against a Licensee. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Member State will be available to any other Member State.
7. Member States contributing information to the Data System may designate
information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of
the contributing State.
8. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing the information
shall be removed from the Data System.
324.1845. 1. The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in
order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a
court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Compact
Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope
and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another
applicable standard of review.
2. The Rules of the Compact Commission shall have the force of law in each
Member State, provided however that where the Rules conflict with the laws or
regulations of a Member State that relate to the procedures, actions, and processes a
Licensed Dietitian is permitted to undertake in that State and the circumstances under
which they may do so, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the
Compact Commission shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
3. The Compact Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to
the criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall
become binding on the day following adoption or as of the date specified in the Rule or
amendment, whichever is later.
4. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a Rule or portion
of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
Compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall
have no further force and effect in any Member State.
5. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Compact
Commission.
6. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts,
opinions, and arguments.
7. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Compact Commission, and at
least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Compact Commission will

HB 1961 20
hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall provide a
Notice of Proposed rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Compact Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
(2) To persons who have requested notice of the Compact Commission's notices
of proposed rulemaking; and
(3) In such other way or ways as the Compact Commission may by Rule specify.
8. The Notice of Proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Compact
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time,
date, and location of the meeting where the Compact Commission will consider and vote
on the proposed Rule;
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
means of communication, the Compact Commission shall include the mechanism for
access to the hearing in the Notice of Proposed rulemaking;
(3) The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
(4) A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person;
and
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
9. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Compact Commission in response to the
proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
10. Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Compact Commission at
hearings required by this Section.
11. (1) The Compact Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take
final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the
Rule.
(2) The Compact Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
(3) The Compact Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive
changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
(4) The Compact Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the
Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection 12 of this section, the effective
date of the Rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted
or amended the Rule.

HB 1961 21
12. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Compact Commission
may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 hours' notice, with opportunity to
comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and
in this Section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible,
in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the
purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately
in order to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Compact Commission or Member State funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal
law or rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
13. The Compact Commission or an authorized committee of the Compact
Commission may direct revision to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors.
Public notice of any revision shall be posted on the website of the Compact Commission.
The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days
after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results
in a material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Compact Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the
revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision
may not take effect without the approval of the Compact Commission.
14. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.
324.1850. 1. (1) The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement this Compact.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is proper and judicial
proceedings by or against the Compact Commission shall be brought solely and
exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Compact Commission is located. The Compact Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct, or any such similar matter.
(3) The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall

HB 1961 22
have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the
Compact Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the
Compact Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
2. (1) If the Compact Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or
the promulgated Rules, the Compact Commission shall provide written notice to the
defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of
curing the default, and any other action that the Compact Commission may take and
shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(2) The Compact Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the
other Member States.
3. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of
the Member States, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that State by
this Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the
default does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during
the period of default.
4. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all
other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
terminate shall be given by the Compact Commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's Licensing
Authority, and each of the Member States' Licensing Authority.
5. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
6. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this Compact, that State
shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that State of such termination.
The terminated State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted
pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of six months after the date of said notice of
termination.
7. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed
upon in writing between the Compact Commission and the defaulting State.
8. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Compact Commission by
petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Compact Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.

HB 1961 23
9. (1) Upon request by a Member State, the Compact Commission shall attempt
to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States and between
Member and non-Member States.
(2) The Compact Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
10. (1) By supermajority vote, the Compact Commission may initiate legal
action against a Member State in default in the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Compact Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.
In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the Compact Commission. The Compact Commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting Member
State's law.
(2) A Member State may initiate legal action against the Compact Commission
in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Compact Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions
of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney's fees.
(3) No party other than a Member State shall enforce this Compact against the
Compact Commission.
324.1855. 1. (1) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
(2) (a) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Compact Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven Member States
("Charter Member States") to determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter
Member State is materially different than the model Compact statute.
(b) A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially different
from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in
section 324.1850.
(c) If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is terminated, or
withdraws from the Compact, the Compact Commission shall remain in existence and
the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of Member States should be less
than seven.

HB 1961 24
(3) Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven initial Charter
Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision (21) of subsection
3 of section 324.1835 to determine if their enactments are materially different from the
model Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.
(4) All actions taken for the benefit of the Compact Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective
date of the Compact or the Compact Commission coming into existence shall be
considered to be actions of the Compact Commission unless specifically repudiated by
the Compact Commission.
(5) Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Compact Commission's
initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Rules and bylaws as they
exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has
been previously adopted by the Compact Commission shall have the full force and effect
of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that State.
2. (1) Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
(2) A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after
enactment of the repealing statute.
(3) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
State's Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action
reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(4) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a State
shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted pursuant to this
Compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
3. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent
any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member State
and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
4. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to this
Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until it is enacted
into the laws of all Member States.
324.1860. 1. This Compact and the Compact Commission's rulemaking
authority shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact
expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to
limit the Compact Commission's rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.

HB 1961 25
2. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
contrary to the constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in the
Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government,
agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof
to any other government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section, the Compact Commission may
deny a State's participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 2 of section 324.1850, terminate a Member State's participation in the
Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a
material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall remain in full force
and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full force and effect as to the
Member State affected as to all severable matters.
324.1865. 1. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
2. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Member State
in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
3. All permissible agreements between the Compact Commission and the
Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
✔